Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Podiatric physician and surgeon" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(2) "Board" means the Washington state podiatric medical board.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(5) "Approved school of podiatric medicine and surgery" means a school approved by the board, which may consider official recognition of the Council of Education of the American Podiatric Medical Association in determining the approval of schools of podiatric medicine and surgery.

[ 1990 c 147 s 2; 1982 c 21 s 2; 1973 c 77 s 1; 1955 c 149 s 1; 1941 c 31 s 1; 1921 c 120 s 1; 1917 c 38 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10074.]